Vermont, session 2025-2026, H336.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. chapter 2 is added to read:
CHAPTER 2. ENFORCEMENT OF EMPLOYMENT LAWS
§ 51. DEFINITIONS
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 2 of 13
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Aggrieved employee” means an employee or former employee
against whom one or more violations of the provisions of this title was
committed. The term “aggrieved employee” includes an individual who is
asserting a claim that the individual was misclassified as an independent
contractor in violation of the provisions of this title. The term “aggrieved
employee” does not include an individual whose terms of employment and
working conditions are covered by a collective bargaining agreement.
(2) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor.
(3) “Employee” means any person who may be permitted, required, or
directed by an employer, in consideration of direct or indirect gain or profit, to
perform services.
(4) “Employer” means an individual; organization; governmental body;
partnership; association; corporation; legal representative; trustee; receiver;
trustee in bankruptcy; and any common carrier by rail, motor, water, air, or
express company doing business in or operating within this State.
(5) “Public enforcement action” means a civil action brought by a
relator pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to enforce provisions of
chapters 5, 9, 12, 16A, and 17 of this title that are enforceable by the
Commissioner, and to enforce provisions of chapter 3 of this title that are
enforceable by the Commissioner of Public Safety.
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 3 of 13
(6) “Relator” means an aggrieved employee, representative
organization, or whistleblower who brings a public enforcement action
pursuant to section 52 of this chapter.
(7) “Representative organization” means a nonprofit corporation or
union that regularly advocates on behalf of employees or assists employees in
the enforcement of the provisions of this title, and that has been selected by an
aggrieved employee or whistleblower to bring a public enforcement action on
the aggrieved employee’s or whistleblower’s behalf pursuant to section 52 of
this chapter.
(8) “Whistleblower” means a current or former employee, contractor,
subcontractor, or employee of a contractor or subcontractor with knowledge of
facts that the individual reasonably believed constitute a violation of the
provisions of this title.
§ 52. PUBLIC ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS
(a)(1) A relator may bring a public enforcement action on behalf of and in
the name of the Commissioner pursuant to the procedures set forth in section
53 of this chapter. A relator may seek the same penalties and injunctive or
declaratory relief that the Commissioner would be entitled to seek if the
Commissioner brought the action.
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 4 of 13
(2) A public enforcement action shall be brought in the Civil Division of
the Superior Court of Washington County or in the county in which the alleged
violation occurred.
(3)(A) A public enforcement action may be brought on behalf of one or
more individuals in relation to one or more violations of the provisions of this
title by the same employer.
(B) A public enforcement action shall be subject to the requirements
of Rule 23(a) of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(b)(1) In a public enforcement action brought pursuant to this chapter, the
court shall be permitted to assess the same penalties for violations of this title
as if the action was brought by the Commissioner.
(2) Any civil penalties assessed pursuant to a public enforcement action
shall be distributed as follows:
(A) If the Commissioner does not intervene on the action, 30 percent
of the proceeds recovered and collected in the action in settlement of the claim
shall be awarded to the relator and the remaining 70 percent shall be awarded
to the Department of Labor.
(B) If the Commissioner intervenes in the action, 20 percent of the
proceeds recovered and collected in the action or in settlement of the claim
shall be awarded to the relator and the remaining 80 percent shall be awarded
to the Department of Labor.
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 5 of 13
(3) If the relator brought the public enforcement action on behalf of one
or more aggrieved employees, the relator shall equitably distribute the amount
awarded to the relator between the relator and the aggrieved employees. In
determining an equitable distribution, the relator may consider the risks and
burdens that the relator incurred in bringing the action. The relator shall
provide to the Commissioner a summary of the amounts distributed.
(4) Of the proceeds awarded to the Department of Labor pursuant to this
section, 25 percent shall be deposited in the Community Outreach and
Workforce Education Special Fund established pursuant to section 56 of this
chapter.
(c) A relator who prevails in a public enforcement action shall also receive
an amount for necessary expenses plus reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, as
determined by the court. The employer shall pay the expenses, fees, and costs
awarded directly to the relator.
(d)(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit an employee’s
right to pursue other remedies that are available to the employee under law.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
Commissioner’s ability to seek restitution or damages on behalf of an
aggrieved employee in a public enforcement action in which the Commissioner
has intervened when such a remedy is available under the applicable law.
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 6 of 13
(e) Any provision of an agreement or contract that restricts an aggrieved
employee’s, representative organization’s, or whistleblower’s right to bring a
private enforcement action shall be void and unenforceable.
(f)(1) A public enforcement action shall be commenced within the time
provided pursuant to the applicable statute of limitations or two years after the
cause of action accrues, whichever period is longer.
(2) The time for bringing a public enforcement action shall be tolled
from the date that the relator files a notice with the Commissioner pursuant to
section 53 of this chapter or the date on which the Commissioner commences
an investigation of the facts underlying the cause of action, whichever is
earlier, until the Commissioner notifies the relator that no citation will be
issued or the Commissioner fails to notify the relator of whether the
Commissioner will issue a citation as required pursuant to subsection 53(b) of
this chapter.
(g)(1) A relator shall not bring a public enforcement action if the
Commissioner, based on the same facts alleged by the relator, issues a citation
to an employer for the same violation of this title as alleged by the relator or
has notified the relator that the Commissioner intends to issue a citation.
(2) A public enforcement action shall not be permitted in relation to an
alleged violation of requirements related to posting or providing notice of the
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 7 of 13
provisions of this title, or an employer’s failure to submit timely reports
pursuant to the provisions of this title.
§ 53. PROCEDURE FOR BRINGING A PUBLIC ENFORCEMENT
ACTION
(a)(1)(A) A relator shall submit to the Commissioner notice of a claim
together with a filing fee of $75.00.
(B) The filing fee may be waived pursuant to rules adopted by the
Commissioner.
(C) A notice may be submitted electronically or by U.S. mail.
(2) Each notice shall include:
(A) the name, address, and contact information of the employer that
is alleged to have violated a provision of this title;
(B) the name, address, and contact information of the aggrieved
employee;
(C) the name, address, and contact information of the relator, if the
relator is not the aggrieved employee;
(D) if the aggrieved employee has retained legal counsel, the name,
address, and contact information of the aggrieved employee’s legal counsel;
(E) if the relator has retained legal counsel, the name, address, and
contact information of the relator’s legal counsel; and
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 8 of 13
(F) a short and plain statement of the alleged violation and the facts
supporting the claim.
(b)(1) Upon receiving notice of the claim, the Commissioner shall:
(A) promptly provide notice to the relator of the date on which the
relator’s notice was received;
(B) determine whether the Commissioner will investigate the claim;
and
(C) provide notice to the relator of its decision regarding whether to
investigate the claim not later than 60 days after the claim was received.
(2) If the Commissioner decides not to investigate the claim or fails to
notify the relator within 60 days, the relator may commence a public
enforcement action in relation to the claim.
(3) If the notice provided by the relator is deficient, the Commissioner
shall notify the relator of the deficiencies in the original notice. Upon
receiving notice of any deficiencies, the relator shall have 30 days to amend
the relator’s original notice and resubmit it to the Commissioner.
(c)(1)(A) If the Commissioner decides to investigate the claim, the
Commissioner will have 120 days to perform the investigation from the date
that the Commissioner notifies the relator of the decision to investigate.
(B) If additional time is necessary to complete the investigation, the
Commissioner may extend the time in which to conduct the investigation by
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 9 of 13
not more than 60 days. The Commissioner shall promptly provide notice to
the relator of a decision to extend the deadline.
(2) At the conclusion of the investigation, the Commissioner shall notify
the relator of whether the Commissioner intends to issue a citation in relation
to the alleged violation.
(3) If the Commissioner notifies the relator that the Commissioner does
not intend to issue a citation or fails to provide the relator with notice of the
outcome of the investigation within the time provided pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection, the relator may commence a public enforcement action
in relation to the claim.
(d)(1) The Commissioner may intervene in any public enforcement action:
(A) by right within 30 days after the action is filed; or
(B) more than 30 days after the action is filed in the Superior Court
for good cause shown, as determined by the court.
(2)(A) If the Commissioner intervenes in a public enforcement action,
the Commissioner shall have primary responsibility for prosecuting the action
and shall not be bound by the actions of the relator in bringing the action.
(B) A relator shall remain a party to any action that the
Commissioner elects to intervene in.
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 10 of 13
(C)(i) If, after intervening, the Commissioner wishes to dismiss or
settle an action, the Commissioner shall ensure that the relator is given notice
of the motion to dismiss or of the proposed settlement.
(ii) The court shall not grant the Commissioner’s motion to
dismiss or approve a proposed settlement until the relator has been afforded an
opportunity to be heard on the motion or proposed settlement, and the court
has determined that either:
(I) granting the motion would be fair and in the public interest;
or
(II) that the proposed settlement is fair, adequate, reasonable,
and in the public interest.
(3) If the Commissioner does not intervene in the public enforcement
action, the relator shall be permitted to conduct the action subject to the
following limitations:
(A)(i) The relator shall provide a copy of any proposed settlement to
the Commissioner and the court.
(ii) The Court shall review any proposed settlement of a public
enforcement action and shall only approve a settlement if the court determines
that it is fair, adequate, reasonable, and in the public interest.
(B) Upon request, the Commissioner shall be served with copies of
any pleadings filed in a public enforcement action and provided with copies of
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 11 of 13
any deposition transcripts. The Commissioner shall bear any costs related to
the service and copying of the requested pleadings and deposition transcripts.
§ 54. RETALIATION PROHIBITED
(a) An employer shall not discharge or in any manner retaliate against an
employee because:
(1) the employee has brought a public enforcement action;
(2) the employee has submitted notice of a claim to the Commissioner
pursuant to section 53 of this chapter;
(3) the employee has cooperated with the relator in relation to a public
enforcement action; or
(4) the employer believes that the employee may bring a public
enforcement action, submit notice of a claim to the Commissioner, or
cooperate with a relator in relation to a public enforcement action.
(b) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring an action
in the Civil Division of the Superior Court seeking compensatory and punitive
damages or equitable relief, including restraint of prohibited acts, restitution of
wages or benefits, reinstatement, costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, and other
appropriate relief.
§ 55. PUBLIC DATABASE
(a) The Commissioner shall maintain a publicly accessible database of all
public enforcement actions brought pursuant to this chapter.
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 12 of 13
(b)(1) The database shall be searchable by the names of the parties, the
disposition of the action, and the statute pursuant to which the action was
brought.
(2) The database shall include information regarding the outcome of the
Commissioner’s investigation, whether the Commissioner elected to intervene
in the action, and any other appropriate information as established in rules
adopted by the Commissioner.
§ 56. COMMUNITY OUTREACH AND WORKFORCE EDUCATION
SPECIAL FUND
(a) There is established the Community Outreach and Workforce Education
Special Fund, which shall be managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7,
subchapter 5. The Fund shall consist of 25 percent of the proceeds that are
awarded to the Department of Labor from the amounts recovered and collected
in public enforcement actions or in the settlement of claims brought pursuant
to this chapter. The Commissioner of Labor may seek and accept gifts,
donations, and grants from any source, public or private, to be dedicated for
deposit into the Fund.
(b) The Fund shall be available to the Commissioner to provide grants to
labor or nonprofit organizations for activities to assist workers in enforcing
their employment rights, including outreach, community-based education, the
VT LEG #379427 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.336
2025 Page 13 of 13
creation and distribution of training materials, technical assistance, counseling
and legal research, and referral services.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379427 v.1